Illinois, session 104th, HB1169.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Lobbyist Registration Act is amended by 5changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (25 ILCS 170/5)7    Sec. 5. Lobbyist registration and disclosure. Every 8natural person and every entity required to register under 9this Act shall before any service is performed which requires 10the natural person or entity to register, but in any event not 11later than 2 business days after being employed or retained, 12file in the Office of the Secretary of State a statement in a 13format prescribed by the Secretary of State containing the 14following information with respect to each person or entity 15employing, retaining, or benefitting from the services of the 16natural person or entity required to register: 17        (a) The registrant's name, permanent address, e-mail 18    address, if any, fax number, if any, business telephone 19    number, and temporary address, if the registrant has a 20    temporary address while lobbying. 21        (a-5) If the registrant is an entity, the information 22    required under subsection (a) for each natural person 23    associated with the registrant who will be lobbying,   HB1169- 2 -LRB104 06563 SPS 16599 b1    regardless of whether lobbying is a significant part of 2    his or her duties. 3        (b) The name and address of the client or clients 4    employing or retaining the registrant to perform such 5    services or on whose behalf the registrant appears. If the 6    client employing or retaining the registrant is a client 7    registrant, the statement shall also include the name and 8    address of the client or clients of the client registrant 9    on whose behalf the registrant will be or anticipates 10    performing services. 11        (b-5) If the registrant employs or retains a 12    sub-registrant, the statement shall include the name and 13    address of the sub-registrant and identify the client or 14    clients of the registrant on whose behalf the 15    sub-registrant will be or is anticipated to be performing 16    services.17        (b-7) If the registrant retains a consultant, the 18    statement shall include the name and address of the 19    consultant and identify the client or clients and each 20    executive and legislative branch agency for which the 21    consultant is to provide advisory services. 22        (c) For those identified under subsections (b), (b-5), 23    and (b-7), a brief description of the executive, 24    legislative, or administrative action in reference to 25    which such service is to be rendered. 26        (c-5) Each executive and legislative branch agency of   HB1169- 3 -LRB104 06563 SPS 16599 b1    the State and each unit of local government the registrant 2    expects to lobby during the registration period. 3        (c-6) The nature of the client's business, by 4    indicating all of the following categories that apply: (1) 5    banking and financial services, (2) manufacturing, (3) 6    education, (4) environment, (5) healthcare, (6) insurance, 7    (7) community interests, (8) labor, (9) public relations 8    or advertising, (10) marketing or sales, (11) hospitality, 9    (12) engineering, (13) information or technology products 10    or services, (14) social services, (15) public utilities, 11    (16) racing or wagering, (17) real estate or construction, 12    (18) telecommunications, (19) trade or professional 13    association, (20) travel or tourism, (21) transportation, 14    (22) agriculture, and (23) other (setting forth the nature 15    of that other business). 16        (d) A confirmation that the registrant has a sexual 17    harassment policy as required by Section 4.7, that such 18    policy shall be made available to any individual within 2 19    business days upon written request (including electronic 20    requests), that any person may contact the authorized 21    agent of the registrant to report allegations of sexual 22    harassment, and that the registrant recognizes the 23    Inspector General has jurisdiction to review any 24    allegations of sexual harassment alleged against the 25    registrant or lobbyists hired by the registrant. 26        (e) (Blank).  HB1169- 4 -LRB104 06563 SPS 16599 b1        (f) Each elected or appointed public office in this 2    State to be held by the registrant at any time during the 3    registration period. 4    Every natural person and every entity required to register 5under this Act shall annually submit the registration required 6by this Section on or before each January 31. The registrant 7has a continuing duty to report any substantial change or 8addition to the information contained in the registration. A 9registrant who retains a consultant shall file an amended 10registration before any consulting services are performed, but 11in any event not later than 2 business days after the 12consultant is retained, setting forth the information required 13in subsections (b-7) and (c) of this Section. 14    The Secretary of State shall make all filed statements and 15amendments to statements publicly available by means of a 16searchable database that is accessible through the World Wide 17Web. The Secretary of State shall provide all software 18necessary to comply with this provision to all natural persons 19and entities required to file. The Secretary of State shall 20implement a plan to provide computer access and assistance to 21natural persons and entities required to file electronically. 22    All natural persons and entities required to register 23under this Act shall remit a single, annual, and nonrefundable 24$300 registration fee. The Secretary of State shall grant a 25waiver of this registration fee to any not-for-profit entity 26with an annual budget of less than $5,000,000 that is   HB1169- 5 -LRB104 06563 SPS 16599 b1classified as tax-exempt under Section 501(c)(3) of the 2Internal Revenue Code, including a waiver of that fee for any 3lobbyist that exclusively lobbies on behalf of that entity.4     Each natural person required to register under this Act 5shall submit, on an annual basis, a picture of the registrant. 6A registrant may, in lieu of submitting a picture on an annual 7basis, authorize the Secretary of State to use any photo 8identification available in any database maintained by the 9Secretary of State for other purposes. Each registration fee 10collected for registrations shall be deposited into the 11Lobbyist Registration Administration Fund for administration 12and enforcement of this Act. 13(Source: P.A. 101-595, eff. 12-5-19; 102-664, eff. 1-1-22.)